Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.160

Certain firefighters may elect to be covered under other law.

Every firefighter as defined in this chapter heretofore employed as a member of a fire department, whether or not as a prior firefighter as defined in chapter 41.16 RCW, who desires to make the contributions and avail himself or herself of the pension and other benefits of said chapter 41.16 RCW, can do so by handing to and leaving with the firefighters' pension board of his or her municipality a written notice of such intention within sixty days of the effective date of this chapter, or if he or she was on disability retirement under chapter 41.16 RCW, at the effective date of this chapter and has been recalled to active duty by the retirement board, shall give such notice within sixty days of his or her return to active duty, and not otherwise.

[ 2007 c 218 s 56; 1955 c 382 s 17.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Effective date of chapter 41.18 RCW is midnight June 8, 1955; see preface 1955 session laws.

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.